tex/context/patterns/lang-gb.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see e:/tmp/patterns/lang-gb.rme

% used: a c e g h i m n o p r s t u v w y

\hyphenation{
uni-ver-sity
uni-ver-sit-ies
how-ever
ma-nu-script
ma-nu-scripts
re-ci-pro-city
through-out
some-thing}
